Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1 G ENERAL PROVISIONS
12-8-27.1. Solid waste trust fund.

There shall be established the solid waste trust fund. The director shall serve as trustee of the solid waste trust fund. The moneys deposited in such fund pursuant to this Code section, Code Section 12-8-30.6, and Code Section 12-8-40.1 may be expended by the director, with the approval of the board, for the following purposes:

To take whatever emergency action is necessary or appropriate to assure that the public health or safety is not threatened whenever there is a release or substantial threat of a release of contaminants from a disposal facility;

To take preventive or corrective actions where the release of contaminants presents an actual or potential threat to human health or the environment and where the owner or operator has not been identified or is unable or unwilling to perform corrective action, including but not limited to closure and postclosure care of a disposal facility and provisions for providing alternative water supplies;

To take such actions as may be necessary to monitor and provide postclosure care of any disposal facility, including preventive and corrective actions, without regard to the identity or solvency of the owner thereof, commencing five years after the date of completing closure; and

To take such actions as may be necessary to implement the provisions of a scrap tire management program in this state, particularly as may be related to the cleanup of scrap tire disposal piles and facilities, regulation of tire carriers and other handlers, and disbursement of grants and loans to cities, counties, and other persons as may be necessary to implement fully the provisions of this part.

If the director determines that a solid waste or special solid waste handling facility has been abandoned, that the owner or operator thereof has become insolvent, or that for any other reason there is a demonstrated unwillingness or inability of the owner or operator to maintain, operate, or close the facility, to carry out postclosure care of the facility, or to carry out corrective action required as a condition of a permit to the satisfaction of the director, the director may implement the applicable financial responsibility mechanisms. The proceeds from any applicable financial responsibility mechanisms shall be deposited in the solid waste trust fund.

The determination of whether there has been an abandonment, default, or other refusal or inability to perform and comply with closure, postclosure, or corrective action requirements shall be made by the director.

Any interest earned upon the corpus of the solid waste trust fund shall not become a part thereof but shall be paid over to the division to be utilized by the division for administration of the state solid waste management program. Any funds not expended for this purpose in the fiscal year in which they are generated shall be deposited into the state treasury. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to allow the division to retain any funds required by the Constitution of Georgia to be paid into the state treasury. The division shall comply with all provisions of Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, known as the "Budget Act"; provided, however, that the division shall be exempt from the provisions of Code Section

45-12-92

, which requires payment into the state treasury of moneys collected by state agencies.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-27.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3259, § 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 9; Ga. L. 2013, p. 171, § 2/HB 320; Ga. L. 2013, p. 274, § 3/HB 226.)

Code Commission notes.

- The amendment of subsection (a) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2013, p. 171,

§

2, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2013,
p. 274,

§

3. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921); Keener v. McDougall,

232 Ga. 273

(1974) and Ga. L. 2013, p. 141,

§

54(d)/HB 79.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Conservation and Natural Resources:
Waste Management," see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2011).
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-27.2. Financial responsibility.

No solid waste handling facility shall be operated or maintained by any person unless adequate financial responsibility has been demonstrated to the director to ensure the satisfactory maintenance, closure, and postclosure care of such facility or to carry out any corrective action which may be required as a condition of a permit. The available financial responsibility mechanisms shall be expansive with adequate variety and flexibility to allow the owner or operator to meet its financial obligations. The owner or operator shall be allowed to use combined financial responsibility mechanisms for a single facility and shall be allowed to use combined financial responsibility mechanisms for multiple facilities, utilizing actuarially sound risk-spreading techniques. The director shall require the demonstration of financial responsibility prior to issuing a permit for any solid waste handling facility.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to any county, municipality, authority, or special district empowered to engage in solid waste management activities which operates or maintains a solid waste handling facility unless and until such times as federal regulations require counties, municipalities, or special districts to demonstrate financial responsibility for such facilities.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-27.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-28. Lead acid vehicle batteries.

After January 1, 1991, no person may place a used lead acid vehicle battery in mixed municipal solid waste or discard or otherwise dispose of a lead acid vehicle battery except by delivery to a battery retailer or wholesaler, to a secondary lead smelter, or to a collection or recovered materials processing facility that accepts lead acid vehicle batteries.

After January 1, 1991, no battery retailer shall dispose of a used lead acid vehicle battery except by delivery to the agent of a battery wholesaler or a secondary lead smelter, to a battery manufacturer for delivery to a secondary lead smelter, or to a collection or recovered materials processing facility that accepts lead acid vehicle batteries.

After January 1, 1991, any person selling lead acid vehicle batteries at retail or offering lead acid vehicle batteries for retail sale in this state shall:

Accept, at the point of transfer, lead acid vehicle batteries from customers for recycling; and

Post written notice, which must be at least 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches in size and must contain the universal recycling symbol and the following language:

"IT IS ILLEGAL TO PUT A MOTOR VEHICLE BATTERY IN THE GARBAGE. RECYCLE YOUR USED BATTERIES. STATE LAW REQUIRES US TO ACCEPT MOTOR VEHICLE BATTERIES FOR RECYCLING."

After January 1, 1991, any person selling lead acid vehicle batteries at wholesale or offering lead acid vehicle batteries for sale at wholesale must accept, at the point of transfer, lead acid vehicle batteries from customers.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-28

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-29. Investigations by director; actions to enforce article.

The director shall have the authority to investigate any apparent violation of this part and to take any action authorized under this part as he deems necessary and may institute proceedings of mandamus or other proper legal proceedings to enforce this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-29.1. Authority to enter property for inspection and investigation.

The director or his duly authorized representatives shall have the power to enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property for the purpose of inspection and investigation of conditions relating to solid waste handling in this state.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-29.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Waste control, T. 16, C. 7, A. 2, P. 3.

12-8-29.2. Confidentiality of information obtained by director or agents.

Any information relating to secret processes, devices, or methods of manufacture or production, or quantities and sources of recovered materials being privately processed, obtained by the director or his agents in the administration of this part shall be kept confidential.

In the event the employment of the director or his agents with the department terminates for any reason, the confidentiality requirement outlined in subsection (a) of this Code section shall continue to apply to such persons. Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Such criminal penalty shall be in addition to such civil remedies as may be available to any party.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-29.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-30. Director's order for corrective action.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this part or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part has occurred, he shall attempt to obtain a remedy with the violator or violators by conference, conciliation, or persuasion.
In the case of failure of such conference, conciliation, or persuasion to effect a remedy to such violation, the director may issue an order directed to such violator or violators.
The order shall specify the provisions of this part or rule or regulation alleged to have been violated and shall order that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in such order.
Any order issued by the director under this part shall be signed by the director.
Any such order shall become final unless the person or persons named therein request in writing a hearing no later than 30 days after such order is served on such person or persons.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-30.1. Emergency orders.

Whenever the director finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health, safety, or well-being, the director, with the concurrence of the Governor, may issue an order declaring the existence of such an emergency and requiring that such action be taken to meet the emergency as the director specifies.
Such order shall be effective immediately.
Any person to whom such order is directed shall comply therewith immediately, but shall be afforded a hearing within 48 hours.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-30.2. Hearings and review of actions and orders.

All hearings on and review of contested matters and orders and all hearings on and review of any other enforcement actions or orders under this part shall be provided and conducted in accordance
with
subsection
(c)
of Code Section 12-2-2.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-30.3. Judgment in accordance with director's order.

The director may file in the superior court of the county wherein the person under order resides or, if such person is a corporation, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business or, in any case, in the county wherein the violation occurred or in which jurisdiction is appropriate a certified copy of an unappealed final order of the director or of a final order of the director affirmed upon appeal or modified on any review or appeal from which no further review is taken or allowed, whereupon such court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties.
Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though such judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-30.4. Injunctive relief.

Whenever in the judgment of the director any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or will constitute any violation of this part, the director may apply to the superior court of the county where such person resides, or, if such person is a nonresident of the state, to the superior court of the county where such person is engaged in or is about to engage in such act or practice, for an order restraining and enjoining such act or practice.
Upon a showing by the director that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any such act or practice, a temporary or permanent injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing lack of an adequate remedy at law.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-30.5. Attorney General's duties.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or his representative to represent the director in all actions in connection with this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-30.6. Civil penalties for violations; procedures.

Any person, provided that person is a public authority or a city or county government located within the boundaries of Georgia, violating any provision of this part or rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this part or intentionally or negligently failing or refusing to comply with any final or emergency order of the director issued as provided in this part shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for such violation and for an additional civil penalty not to exceed $500.00 for each day during which such violation continues. Any person other than a public authority or a city or county government located within the boundaries of Georgia violating any provision of this part or intentionally or negligently failing or refusing to comply with any final or emergency order of the director issued as provided in this part shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000.00 per day for each day during which such violation continues.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of this part or any rule or regulation effective under this part or has failed or refused to comply with any final order or emergency order of the director, he may upon written request cause a hearing to be conducted before an administrative law judge appointed by the board. Upon finding that said person has violated any provision of this part or any rule or regulation effective under this part or has failed or refused to comply with any final order or emergency order of the director, the administrative law judge shall issue his decision imposing civil penalties as provided in this Code section. Such hearing and any administrative or judicial review thereof shall be conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2.

In rendering a decision under this Code section imposing civil penalties, the administrative law judge shall consider all factors which are relevant, including, but not limited to, the following:

The amount of civil penalty necessary to ensure immediate and continued compliance and the extent to which the violator may have profited by failing or delaying to comply;

The character and degree of impact of the violation or failure to comply on the natural resources of the state, especially any rare or unique natural phenomena;

The conduct of the person incurring the civil penalty in promptly taking all feasible steps or procedures necessary or appropriate to comply or to correct the violation or failure to comply;

Any prior violations or failures to comply by such person with regard to statutes, rules, regulations, or orders administered, adopted, or issued by the director;

The character and degree of injury to or interference with public health or safety which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation or failure to comply;

The character and degree of injury to or interference with reasonable use of property which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation or failure; and

The character and degree of intent with which the conduct of the person incurring the civil penalty was carried out.

All civil penalties recovered by the director as provided in this Code section shall be paid into the solid waste trust fund established pursuant to the provisions of Code Section

12-8-27.1

.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-30.7. Unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in solid waste handling except in such a manner as to conform to and comply with this part and all applicable rules, regulations, and orders established under this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30.7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 10.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-30.8. Penalties for violations.

Any person who:

Knowingly transports or causes to be transported any solid waste as defined in this part to a facility which does not have a permit, which does not have a variance pursuant to this part, or which is not subject to an order of the director which specifically authorized continued operation of such facility;

Knowingly treats, processes, stores, or disposes of any solid waste as defined in this part:

Without a permit or an order of the director allowing such treatment, processing, storage, or disposal of solid waste;

In knowing violation of any material condition or requirement of such permit or order; or

In knowing violation of any material condition or requirement of any applicable regulations or standards adopted by the board in accordance with Code Section 12-8-23;

Knowingly omits material, information, or makes any false material statement or representation in any application, label, manifest, record, report, permit, or other document filed, maintained, or used for purposes of compliance with this part or regulations promulgated pursuant to this part;

Knowingly processes, stores, treats, transports, disposes of, or otherwise handles any solid waste as defined in this part, and who knowingly destroys, alters, conceals, or fails to file any record, application, manifest, report, or other document required to be maintained or filed for purposes of compliance with this part; or

Knowingly transports without a manifest or causes to be transported without a manifest, any solid waste required by this part to be accompanied by a manifest

shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than $50,000.00 for each day of violation or imprisonment for not less than one nor more than two years or, in the case of a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection, three years, or both.
If conviction is for a violation committed after a first conviction of such person under this subsection, the maximum punishment under the respective paragraphs shall be doubled with respect to both fine and imprisonment.

An organization may be convicted for the criminal acts set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section if an agent of the organization performs the conduct which is an element of the criminal act set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section and the agent's action is authorized, requested, commanded, or recklessly tolerated by the board of directors of the organization or by a managerial official who is acting within the scope of such official's employment on behalf of the organization.

Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or other peace officer or local code enforcement officer shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of subsection (c) of Code Section

12-8-40.1

.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30.8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 11; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1101, § 2; Ga. L. 2013, p. 274, § 4/HB 226.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-30.9. Powers of local governmental bodies and state not limited by this part.

No provision of this part and no rule, regulation, or ruling of the board or the director shall be construed to be a limitation:

On the power of a municipality, county, authority, or special district to adopt and enforce additional regulations, not in conflict with this part, imposing further conditions, restrictions, or limitations with respect to the handling or disposal of municipal solid waste;

On the power of a municipality, county, authority, or special district to declare, prohibit, and abate nuisances;

On the power of the Attorney General, at the request of the director or upon his own volition, to bring an action in the name of the State of Georgia; or

On the power of any state agency in the enforcement or administration of any provision of law it is specifically permitted or required to enforce or administer.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30.9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, a comma was inserted following "authority" near the beginning of paragraph (1).

12-8-30.10. Exemption for private individuals.

This part shall not apply to any individual disposing of solid waste originating from his own residence onto land or facilities owned by him when disposal of such waste does not thereby adversely affect the public health.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-30.10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-31. State solid waste management plan; reporting.

By January 1, 1991, the division, jointly with the Department of Community Affairs and in cooperation with the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority and local government officials, shall develop a state solid waste management plan.

The state solid waste management plan shall be submitted to the Governor's Development Council and shall serve as the guide for the development of local plans and regional plans for solid waste management.

The state solid waste management plan shall include but not be limited to:

A general analysis of solid waste management practices currently in use, management alternatives and technologies available, and their application;

Procedures and strategies for meeting state goals and objectives for waste reduction;

Minimum standards and procedures to be met by local and regional solid waste management plans, including the assurance of adequate solid waste handling capability and capacity for the subsequent ten-year period which shall specifically include adequate collection capability;

A procedure for informing the public annually of the locally incurred costs of solid waste management;

Procedures for ensuring cooperative efforts on solid waste management planning by the state, regional commissions, local governments, groups of local governments, and private companies, including a description of the means by which the state will encourage local governments to pursue regional approaches;

A description of public and private alternatives for the provision of solid waste management services;

A description of the respective roles of agencies in the implementation of a state-wide public information education program on solid waste management which emphasizes grass roots participation of all age levels;

Methods of assuring public participation in the planning and decision-making processes; and

Methods for assuring implementation of the state solid waste management plan.

In monitoring and reporting on the implementation success of the state solid waste management plan required under this Code section, the Department of Community Affairs, with the cooperation of the division and the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority, shall report annually to the Governor and the General Assembly on the status of solid waste management in Georgia. The Department of Community Affairs shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the annual report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient. The annual report shall include but not be limited to:

The status of local and regional solid waste planning in Georgia;

The number and types of solid waste handling facilities in Georgia;

The remaining permitted capacity of each permitted solid waste handling facility;

The number and types of solid waste grants made to local governments;

The number and types of solid waste loans made to local governments;

A compilation and analysis of solid waste management data provided by cities and counties in their annual reports;

A statement of progress achieved in meeting the goal established in subsection (c) of Code Section 12-8-21;

A statement of progress achieved in solid waste management education;

Any revisions in the state solid waste management plan which are deemed necessary; and

Recommendations for improving the management of solid waste in this state.

By December 31, 2006, and annually thereafter, the Department of Community Affairs, as part of the annual solid waste report required in subsection (d) of this Code section and in cooperation with state agencies and other entities involved in litter prevention or abatement, shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly the status of litter prevention and abatement in this state. The litter report shall include but not be limited to:

An itemization of expenditures made from the Solid Waste Trust Fund for the prevention and abatement of litter;

A compilation and analysis of litter prevention, collection, and enforcement efforts;

An assessment of littering in this state;

A statement of progress in achieving a litter prevention ethic; and

Recommendations for improving litter abatement and prevention efforts.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 10/SB 49; Ga. L. 2006, p. 275, § 3-2/HB 1320; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 19/HB 1216; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244.)

Cross references.

- Emergency powers of Governor generally,

§§

38-3-22

,

38-3-51

,

45-12-29

et seq.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2006, p. 275,

§

1-1/HB 1320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Comprehensive Litter Prevention and Abatement Act of 2006."'

Ga. L. 2006, p. 275,

§

5-1/HB 1320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall become effective April 21, 2006, for purposes of adopting local ordinances to become effective on or after July 1, 2006.

12-8-31.1. Local, multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste plans; reporting by cities and counties; annual reporting requirements for landfill owners and operators.

Each city and county in Georgia shall develop or be included in a comprehensive solid waste management plan. Said plan may be developed independently as a local plan or jointly with other jurisdictions as a multijurisdictional or regional solid waste plan.

The Department of Community Affairs under the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50 shall promulgate solid waste planning guidance that a city or county may use to update or amend such city's or county's solid waste plan.

Any city or county that proposes to update or amend its solid waste management plan shall publish notice of such proposed action in the county legal organ or the city's or county's Internet website, as applicable, at least two weeks prior to adopting such update or amendment to its plan in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section.

The local, multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste plan and plan updates shall, at a minimum, provide for the assurance of adequate solid waste handling capability and capacity within the planning area for at least ten years from the date of completion of the plan which shall specifically include an adequate collection and disposal capability; shall enumerate the solid waste handling facilities as to size and type; and shall identify those sites which are not suitable for solid waste handling facilities based on environmental and land use factors.

To be included as part of a local, multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste plan, each city and county included as part of the plan shall adopt the plan and any plan updates by local ordinance or resolution.

Each city and county may report annually to the Department of Community Affairs on the status of solid waste management in the jurisdiction. Such reports may be individual or collective in nature or, in lieu of local reports, a regional report may be filed by any of the several regional commissions for political jurisdictions within their region. The annual report may include but not be limited to:

The amount of solid waste collected, processed, and disposed of in the area;

The progress on the reduction in solid waste, as evidenced by the solid waste received at disposal facilities in the planning area since the previous reporting period and total cumulative progress made toward meeting the waste reduction goals of the state;

The remaining permitted capacity of disposal facilities;

Recycling and composting activities in existence;

Public information and education activities during the reporting period; and

Any other pertinent information as may be required.

After July 1, 1992, no permit, grant, or loan shall be issued for any municipal solid waste disposal facility or any solid waste handling equipment or recycling equipment used in conjunction therewith in a county or region which is not consistent with a local, multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste management plan. Each application for a permit, grant, or loan issued after July 1, 1992, shall include the following:

Certification that the facility for which a permit is sought complies with local land use and zoning requirements, if any;

Verification that the facility for which a permit is sought meets the ten-year capacity needs identified in the local, multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste management plan; and

Demonstration that the host jurisdiction and all jurisdictions generating solid waste destined for the applicant's facility are part of an approved solid waste management plan or updated plan developed consistent with standards promulgated pursuant to this part, and are actively involved in, and have a strategy for, meeting the state-wide goal for reduction of solid waste disposal.

This Code section shall not apply to:

Any solid waste disposal facility which is operated exclusively by a private solid waste generator on property owned by the private solid waste generator for the purpose of accepting solid waste exclusively from the private solid waste generator so long as the operation of the solid waste disposal facility does not adversely affect the public health or the environment. After commencement of operation by a private solid waste generator of a solid waste disposal facility which is permitted but not included in a local or regional solid waste management plan, an amendment into a local or regional solid waste management plan shall be required for any solid waste which is to be no longer disposed of by the private solid waste generator in its own solid waste disposal facility prior to any substantial reduction in the amount of solid waste accepted by the solid waste disposal facility or its closure; or

Any privately owned solid waste handling facility seeking a permit or major modification of an existing permit where the host local governing authority has failed to make a good faith effort, as determined by the Department of Community Affairs, to develop and adopt a local solid waste management plan or to be included in a multijurisdictional or regional solid waste management plan; provided, however, that the permit applicant continues to be obligated to demonstrate that all generating jurisdictions from which waste will be received are part of an approved solid waste management plan developed in accordance with planning guidance promulgated pursuant to this part and have a strategy to meet and are actively engaged in meeting the state-wide goal of reducing waste.

Effective July 1, 1991, it shall be the responsibility of the owner or operator of each municipal solid waste disposal facility to keep an accurate written record of all amounts of solid waste measured in tons received at the facility. Measurement in tons of solid waste received shall be accomplished by one or more of the following methods:

The provision of stationary or portable scales at the disposal facility for weighing incoming waste;

Implementation of contractual or other arrangements for the use of scales at a location other than the disposal facility for weighing all waste destined for disposal at the facility; or

Implementation of contractual or other arrangements for the use of scales at a location other than the disposal facility to weigh representative samples of the solid waste received at the disposal facility on a basis which is sufficiently frequent to estimate accurately the amount of solid waste received at the disposal facility.

The provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section notwithstanding, each public or private owner or operator of a municipal solid waste landfill shall report annually to the Department of Community Affairs on the status of solid waste management for each municipal solid waste landfill it owns or operates in this state. The annual report for each such landfill shall include but not be limited to:

The amount of solid waste collected, processed, and disposed of at such landfill;

The remaining permitted capacity of the landfill;

Recycling and composting activities in existence at such landfill; and

Any other pertinent information as may be required by the Department of Community Affairs.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-31.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 12; Ga. L. 1993, p. 399, § 8; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, §§ 13, 19/HB 1216; Ga. L. 2011, p. 312, § 1/SB 157.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).